Arkansas, session 2025, HB1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-1-101(29)(D), concerning the definition
of "normal retirement age" as it applies to a noncontributory member with
credited service for employment as a public safety employee or as a sheriff
under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, is amended to read as
follows:
*LJH049*
01/21/2025 3:28:21 PM LJH049

HB1188
(D)(i) For a noncontributory member with credited service for employment as a
public safety employee or as a sheriff, age sixty-five (65) years reduced by
one (1) month for each two (2) months of such credited service, but in no
event to an age younger than fifty-five (55) years of age, except in the case
of a sheriff who has a minimum of ten (10) years of actual service as a
sheriff or who has eight (8) years of actual service as a sheriff and a
minimum of two (2) years of service in another state-supported retirement
system, for whom the minimum retirement age shall be fifty-two (52) years of
age; or
(ii) The age upon completion of:
(a) Twenty-seven (27) years of credited
service, if the member retires after December 31, 2025, and before January 1,
2027;
(b) Twenty-six (26) years of credited service,
if the member retires after December 31, 2026, and before January 1, 2028; or
(c) Twenty-five (25) years of credited
service, if the member retires on January 1, 2028, or later;



















01/21/2025 3:28:21 PM LJH049